Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 19 Freedom of Information Act of 1967
25-19-105. Examination and copying of public records.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by this section or by laws specifically enacted to provide otherwise, all public records shall be open to inspection and copying by any citizen of the State of Arkansas during the regular business hours of the custodian of the records.

However, access to inspect and copy public records shall be denied to:

A person who at the time of the request has pleaded guilty to or been found guilty of a felony and is incarcerated in a correctional facility; and

The representative of a person under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section unless the representative is the person's attorney who is requesting information that is subject to disclosure under this section.

A citizen may make a request to the custodian to inspect, copy, or receive copies of public records.

The request may be made in person, by telephone, by mail, by facsimile transmission, by electronic mail, or by other electronic means provided by the custodian.

The request shall be sufficiently specific to enable the custodian to locate the records with reasonable effort.

If the person to whom the request is directed is not the custodian of the records, the person shall so notify the requester and identify the custodian, if known to or readily ascertainable by the person.

It is the specific intent of this section that the following shall not be deemed to be made open to the public under the provisions of this chapter:

State income tax records;

Medical records, adoption records, and education records as defined in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, unless their disclosure is consistent with the provisions of that act;

The site files and records maintained by the Arkansas Historic Preservation Program and the Arkansas Archeological Survey;

Grand jury minutes;

Unpublished drafts of judicial or quasi-judicial opinions and decisions;

Undisclosed investigations by law enforcement agencies of suspected criminal activity;

Unpublished memoranda, working papers, and correspondence of the Governor, members of the General Assembly, Supreme Court Justices, Court of Appeals Judges, and the Attorney General;

Documents that are protected from disclosure by order or rule of court;

Files that if disclosed would give advantage to competitors or bidders; and

Records maintained by the Arkansas Economic Development Commission related to any business entity's planning, site location, expansion, operations, or product development and marketing, unless approval for release of those records is granted by the business entity.

However, this exemption shall not be applicable to any records of expenditures or grants made or administered by the commission and otherwise disclosable under the provisions of this chapter;

The identities of law enforcement officers currently working undercover with their agencies and identified in the Arkansas Minimum Standards Office as undercover officers.

Records of the number of undercover officers and agency lists are not exempt from this chapter;

Records containing measures, procedures, instructions, or related data used to cause a computer or a computer system or network, including telecommunication networks or applications thereon, to perform security functions, including, but not limited to, passwords, personal identification numbers, transaction authorization mechanisms, and other means of preventing access to computers, computer systems or networks, or any data residing therein;

Personnel records to the extent that disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

Personal contact information, including without limitation home or mobile telephone numbers, personal email addresses, and home addresses of nonelected state employees, nonelected municipal employees, nonelected school employees, and nonelected county employees contained in employer records, except that the custodian of the records shall verify an employee's city or county of residence or address on record upon request;

Materials, information, examinations, and answers to examinations utilized by boards and commissions for purposes of testing applicants for licensure by state boards or commissions;

Military service discharge records or DD Form 214, the Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty of the United States Department of Defense, filed with the county recorder as provided under § 14-2-102, for veterans discharged from service less than seventy (70) years from the current date;

Vulnerability assessments submitted by a public water system on or before June 30, 2004, to the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency for a period of ten (10) years from the date of submission;

[Repealed.]

Records, including analyses, investigations, studies, reports, recommendations, requests for proposals, drawings, diagrams, blueprints, and plans containing information relating to security for any public water system or municipally owned utility system.

The records under subdivision (b)(18)(A) include:

Risk and vulnerability assessments;

Plans and proposals for preventing and mitigating security risks;

Emergency response and recovery records;

Security plans and procedures;

Plans and related information for generation, transmission, and distribution systems; and

Other records containing information that if disclosed might jeopardize or compromise efforts to secure and protect the public water system or municipally owned utility system;

Records pertaining to the issuance, renewal, expiration, suspension, or revocation of a license to carry a concealed handgun, or a present or past licensee under § 5-73-301 et seq., including without limitation all records provided to or obtained by a local, state, or federal government or their officials, agents, or employees in the investigation of an applicant, licensee, or past licensee, and all records pertaining to a criminal or health history check conducted on the applicant, licensee, or past licensee except that:

Information or other records regarding an applicant, licensee, or past licensee may be released to a law enforcement agency to assist in a criminal investigation or prosecution or to determine the validity of or eligibility for a license; and

The name of an applicant, licensee, or past licensee may be released as contained in investigative or arrest reports of law enforcement that are subject to release as public records;

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(20)(B) of this section, personal information of current and former public water system customers and municipally owned utility system customers, including without limitation:

Home and mobile telephone numbers;

Personal email addresses;

Home and business addressees; and

Customer usage data.

Personal information of a current or former water system customer or municipally owned utility system customer may be disclosed to:

The current or former water system customer, who may receive his or her own information;

A person who serves as the attorney, guardian, or other representative of the current or former water system customer, who may receive the information of his or her client, ward, or principal;

A tenant of the current or former water system customer or municipally owned utility system customer, who may receive notice of pending termination of service;

A federal or state office or agency for the purpose of participating in research being conducted by such federal or state office or agency, if the federal or state office or agency agrees to prohibit disclosure of the personal information;

For the purpose of facilitating a shared billing arrangement, a county, municipality, improvement district, urban service district, public utility, public facilities board, or public water authority that provides or provided a service to the current or former water system customer or municipally owned utility system customer; or

An agent or vendor of the water system or municipally owned utility system that provides a billing or administrative service to the water system or municipally owned utility system provided that the agent or vendor and the water system or municipally owned utility system enter an agreement that prohibits disclosure by the agent or vendor of the water system or municipally owned utility system of the personal information of a current or former water system customer or municipally owned utility system customer to any other person;

Electronic data information maintained by a disaster recovery system;

The date of birth, home address, email address, phone number, and other contact information from county or municipal parks and recreation department records of a person who was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the request made under this section;

Information related to taxes collected by particular entities under § 26-74-501 et seq.; the Advertising and Promotion Commission Act, § 26-75-601 et seq.; and § 26-75-701 et seq.

However, this exemption does not apply to information or other records regarding the total taxes collected under § 26-74-501 et seq.; the Advertising and Promotion Commission Act, § 26-75-601 et seq.; and § 26-75-701 et seq. in the county or municipality as a whole;

Undisclosed and ongoing investigations by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, or Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division.

Completed investigations by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, or Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division or investigations by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, or Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division that have been provided to the person or entity under investigation are subject to disclosure under this section;

When the custodian is a governmental entity that has knowledge of the individual's assistance as described in this subdivision (b)(25)(A), information that could reasonably be used to identify an individual who is assisting or has assisted a governmental entity in one (1) or more investigations, whether open or closed, of matters that are criminal in nature, if disclosure of the individual's identity could reasonably be expected to endanger the life or physical safety of the individual or a member of the individual's family within the first degree of consanguinity and:

The individual is a confidential informant;

The individual is a confidential source; or

The individual's assistance is or was provided under the assurance of confidentiality.

As used in this subdivision (b)(25), “information that could reasonably be used to identify an individual” includes the following:

The individual's name;

The individual's date of birth;

A physical description of the individual that could reasonably be used to identify him or her;

The individual's Social Security number, driver's license number, or other government-issued number specific to him or her;

The individual's work or personal contact information; and

Any other information about the individual that could reasonably be used to identify the individual; and

Records, including analyses, investigations, studies, reports, recommendations, requests for proposals, drawings, diagrams, blueprints, and plans containing information relating to security for any medical marijuana cultivation facility, marijuana dispensary, or marijuana laboratory processor.

The records under subdivision (b)(26)(A) of this section include:

Risk and vulnerability assessments;

Plans and proposals for preventing and mitigating security risks;

Emergency response and recovery records;

Security plans and procedures;

Plans and related information for generation, transmission, and distribution systems; and

Other information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize or compromise efforts to secure and protect the security of a medical marijuana cultivation facility, marijuana dispensary, or marijuana laboratory processor.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(12) of this section, all employee evaluation or job performance records, including preliminary notes and other materials, shall be open to public inspection only upon final administrative resolution of any suspension or termination proceeding at which the records form a basis for the decision to suspend or terminate the employee and if there is a compelling public interest in their disclosure.

Any personnel or evaluation records exempt from disclosure under this chapter shall nonetheless be made available to the person about whom the records are maintained or to that person's designated representative.

Upon receiving a request for the examination or copying of personnel or evaluation records, the custodian of the records shall determine within twenty-four (24) hours of the receipt of the request whether the records are exempt from disclosure and make efforts to the fullest extent possible to notify the person making the request and the subject of the records of that decision.

If the subject of the records cannot be contacted in person or by telephone within the twenty-four-hour period, the custodian shall send written notice via overnight mail to the subject of the records at his or her last known address. Either the custodian, requester, or the subject of the records may immediately seek an opinion from the Attorney General, who, within three (3) working days of receipt of the request, shall issue an opinion stating whether the decision is consistent with this chapter.

In the event of a review by the Attorney General, the custodian shall not disclose the records until the Attorney General has issued his or her opinion.

However, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the requester or the subject of the records from seeking judicial review of the custodian's decision or the decision of the Attorney General.

Reasonable access to public records and reasonable comforts and facilities for the full exercise of the right to inspect and copy those records shall not be denied to any citizen.

Upon request and payment of a fee as provided in subdivision (d)(3) of this section, the custodian shall furnish copies of public records if the custodian has the necessary duplicating equipment.

A citizen may request a copy of a public record in any medium in which the record is readily available or in any format to which it is readily convertible with the custodian's existing software.

A custodian is not required to compile information or create a record in response to a request made under this section.

Except as provided in § 25-19-109 or by law, any fee for copies shall not exceed the actual costs of reproduction, including the costs of the medium of reproduction, supplies, equipment, and maintenance, but not including existing agency personnel time associated with searching for, retrieving, reviewing, or copying the records.

The custodian may also charge the actual costs of mailing or transmitting the record by facsimile or other electronic means.

If the estimated fee exceeds twenty-five dollars ($25.00), the custodian may require the requester to pay that fee in advance.

Copies may be furnished without charge or at a reduced charge if the custodian determines that the records have been requested primarily for noncommercial purposes and that waiver or reduction of the fee is in the public interest.

The custodian shall provide an itemized breakdown of charges under subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this section.

If a public record is in active use or storage and therefore not available at the time a citizen asks to examine it, the custodian shall certify this fact in writing to the applicant and set a date and hour within three (3) working days at which time the record will be available for the exercise of the right given by this chapter.

No request to inspect, copy, or obtain copies of public records shall be denied on the ground that information exempt from disclosure is commingled with nonexempt information.

Any reasonably segregable portion of a record shall be provided after deletion of the exempt information.

The amount of information deleted shall be indicated on the released portion of the record and, if technically feasible, at the place in the record where the deletion was made.

If it is necessary to separate exempt from nonexempt information in order to permit a citizen to inspect, copy, or obtain copies of public records, the custodian shall bear the cost of the separation.

Any computer hardware or software acquired by an entity subject to § 25-19-103(7)(A) after July 1, 2001, shall be in full compliance with the requirements of this section and shall not impede public access to records in electronic form.

Notwithstanding any Arkansas law to the contrary, at the conclusion of any investigation conducted by a state agency in pursuit of civil penalties against the subject of the investigation, any settlement agreement entered into by a state agency shall be deemed a public document for the purposes of this chapter. However, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any investigation or settlement agreement involving any state tax covered by the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, § 26-18-101 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1137, § 1, provided:

“6-60-108. Audit records.

“(a)(1)After an audit report is presented to the governing board of the institution of higher education, the audit report and copies of any documents contained in the working papers related to the audit report are open to public inspection under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., except:

“(A)Documents specifically exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.; and

“(B)Documents that disclose auditing procedures and techniques, including the following:

“(i)Internal control questionnaires consisting of the checklist of accounting and administrative procedures employed by auditors in the course of performing an audit; and

“(ii)The instructions and guidelines provided by or to the auditors about the examination procedures to be followed in the course of examining records and accounts to verify their accuracy, including verifications that the examination procedures have been followed.

“(2)The documents described in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section are exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

“(b)(1)Until an audit report has been presented to the governing board of the institution of higher education, all working papers, including without limitation communications, notes, memoranda, preliminary drafts of audit reports, and other data gathered in the preparation of audit reports by auditors employed by or on behalf of a governing board of an institution of higher education, are exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

“(2)The exemption provided under this section applies to all working papers in the custody or possession of any person before presentation of the audit report to the governing board of the institution of higher education regardless of the actual physical location of the report.

“(c)As used in this section, ‘audit’ means a financial audit, performance audit, technology audit, review, report of agreed-upon procedures, compilation, examination, investigation, or other report or procedure approved by the governing board of an institution of higher education.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 631 substituted “July 1, 2011” for “July 1, 2009” in (b)(18)(C) and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1291 added (b)(19) and made related changes.

The 2011 amendment by No. 99 substituted “July 1, 2013” for “July 1, 2011” in (b)(18)(C).

The 2011 amendment by No. 168 redesignated former (a)(1)(B)(i)(a ) and (b ) as (a)(1)(B)(i) and (ii), and deleted former (a)(1)(B)(ii); deleted “of the Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction” following “public records” in present (a)(1)(B); and substituted “(a)(1)(B)(i)” for “(a)(1)(B)(i)(a )” in present (a)(1)(B)(ii).

The 2013 amendment by No. 145 substituted “government or” for “governments” in the introductory language of (b)(19); in (b)(19)(A), substituted “to assist” for “for the purpose of assisting” and “to determine the” for “for determining”; substituted “The name” for “Names” in (b)(19)(B); and deleted (b)(19)(C).

The 2013 amendment by No. 235 substituted “under (b)(18)(A)” for “shall” in (b)(18)(B); and deleted former (b)(18)(C).

The 2013 amendment by No. 411, in (b)(13), added “Personal contact information, including without limitation home or mobile telephone numbers, personal email addresses, and” at the beginning and inserted “nonelected school employees” following “nonelected municipal employees.”

The 2015 amendment by No. 186 added “or municipally owned utility system” to the end of (b)(18)(A); redesignated former (b)(18)(B)(v) as (b)(18)(B)(vi); inserted present (b)(18)(B)(v); added “or municipally owned utility system” to the end of (b)(18)(B)(vi); and added (b)(20).

The 2015 amendment by No. 881 added (b)(21).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1015 added (b)(22).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1102 added (b)(23).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (b)(20) as (b)(20)(A); added “Except as provided in subdivision (b)(20)(B) of this section” in (b)(20)(A); and added (b)(20)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 392 repealed (b)(17).

The 2019 amendment by No. 568 added (b)(24).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas Heritage” for “Department of Arkansas Heritage” in (b)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1012 added (b)(25).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1034 added (b)(26).

Cross References. Student competency tests excluded, §6-15-415.

Confidentiality of military discharge records, §14-2-102(c)-(e).

Disposition of criminal data to the central repository, §12-12-1505.

Dissemination of criminal history information, requirements and exceptions, §12-12-1504.

ALR.

Disclosure of Electronic Data under State Public Records and Freedom of Information Acts. 54 A.L.R.6th 653.

Construction and Application of Public Domain Doctrine Allowing Courts to Disregard FOIA Law Enforcement Exemption Based on Prior Public Release of Requested Records. 3 A.L.R. Fed. 3d Art. 5 (2016).

Construction and Application of Public Domain or Official Acknowledgment Doctrine Allowing Courts to Disregard FOIA Exemption, Other Than Law Enforcement Exemption, Based on Prior Public Release of Requested Records. 17 A.L.R. Fed. 3d Art. 1 (2016).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Miscellaneous, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 593.

Brooks, Adventures in Cyber-Space: Computer Technology and the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 417.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, State Government, Freedom of Information Act, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 493.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Local Government, Protection for Veterans, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 433.

J. Lyn Entrikin, The Right of Privacy in Arkansas: A Progressive State, 35 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 439 (2013).

There is a rational basis for exempting the working papers of the governor, the legislators, and the supreme court justices from public disclosure. Such protection promotes and encourages free exchange of thought in each of the three branches of government. McCambridge v. City of Little Rock, 298 Ark. 219, 766 S.W.2d 909 (1989).

The attorney-client privilege has no application outside of court proceedings and, therefore, cannot create an exception to the Freedom of Information Act. McCambridge v. City of Little Rock, 298 Ark. 219, 766 S.W.2d 909 (1989).

Subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, which permits an incarcerated felon to request information of public record only through an attorney, did not violate the inmate's due process right to access the courts because the inmate suffered no actual injury from the statute, as he had rights available to him through habeas petition.Holt v. Howard, 806 F.3d 1129 (8th Cir. 2015).

Subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section, which permits an incarcerated felon to request information of public record only through an attorney, does not violate the Fourteenth Amendment's Equal Protection Clause because the statute is rationally related to preventing the use of records to harass or threaten victims or witnesses and to conserving government resources.Holt v. Howard, 806 F.3d 1129 (8th Cir. 2015).

Generally, all public records are available for inspection under the Freedom of Information Act; exceptions are spelled out in this section. City of Fayetteville v. Rose, 294 Ark. 468, 743 S.W.2d 817 (1988)Criticized byArkansas Gazette Co. v. Goodwin, 304 Ark. 204, 801 S.W.2d 284 (Ark. 1990).

This chapter does not require a court to provide, free of charge, a copy of material on file with the court; a petitioner is not entitled to photocopying at public expense unless he demonstrates some compelling need for specific documentary evidence to support an allegation contained in a petition for post-conviction relief. Moore v. State, 324 Ark. 453, 921 S.W.2d 606 (1996).

The Freedom of Information Act should be broadly construed in favor of disclosure, and exceptions construed narrowly in order to counterbalance the self-protective instincts of the governmental bureaucracy. McCambridge v. City of Little Rock, 298 Ark. 219, 766 S.W.2d 909 (1989); Bryant v. Mars, 309 Ark. 480, 830 S.W.2d 869 (1992).

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 8 was not merely remedial or procedural in nature, but created new exemptions from public disclosure which did not exist before. Statutes which are remedial or procedural generally supply new, different, or more appropriate remedies which relate to existing rights, and do not create new rights or extinguish old ones. Gannett River States Publishing Co. v. Arkansas Indus. Dev. Comm'n, 303 Ark. 684, 799 S.W.2d 543 (1990).

Any exemption from disclosure is to be narrowly construed, and when the scope of an exemption is unclear or ambiguous, the court will interpret it in a manner that favors disclosure. Young v. Rice, 308 Ark. 593, 826 S.W.2d 252 (1992).

Exemptions to the Freedom of Information Act are to be narrowly construed. Troutt Bros. v. Emison, 311 Ark. 27, 841 S.W.2d 604 (1992); Young v. Rice, 308 Ark. 593, 826 S.W.2d 252 (1992).

The court's policy regarding this chapter has been enunciated clearly in our case law — it will interpret it liberally to accomplish the purpose of promoting free access to public information. Johninson v. Stodola, 316 Ark. 423, 872 S.W.2d 374 (1994).

After reviewing §§25-19-102,25-19-106, and this section, the court found nothing in the Freedom of Information Act that specifies that the communications media by which the public's business is conducted are limited to publicly owned communications; thus, the court rejected a state employee's claim that the employee was asked to violate the law by communicating with the governor via a private email address and, thus, the employee's subsequent resignation was voluntary without good cause and the employee was not entitled to benefits under §11-10-513(a)(1). Bradford v. Dir., Empl. Sec. Dep't., 83 Ark. App. 332, 128 S.W.3d 20 (2003).

Trial court erred by finding that the driver received a timely and compliant response from appellees because the response, refusing to comply with the request on the ground that it was too broad and too burdensome, was in direct conflict with the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) and with the court's case law interpreting the FOIA.Daugherty v. Jacksonville Police Dep't, 2012 Ark. 264, 411 S.W.3d 196 (2012).

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 8 contains neither express language nor clear implication mandating retroactive effect, and operates prospectively only. Gannett River States Publishing Co. v. Arkansas Indus. Dev. Comm'n, 303 Ark. 684, 799 S.W.2d 543 (1990).

In order to invoke a narrowly construed exemption under this chapter, the circuit court must peruse the pertinent data in question in order to make an informed decision. Johninson v. Stodola, 316 Ark. 423, 872 S.W.2d 374 (1994).

The circuit court must review the relevant files in camera in order to make its decision that the exemption of subdivision (b)(6) of this section applies across the board to those files. Johninson v. Stodola, 316 Ark. 423, 872 S.W.2d 374 (1994).

Where the records in question are established as “public records” pursuant to §25-19-103(1) of the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act and not otherwise exempted from disclosure, the appropriate governmental agency shall have the responsibility to provide reasonable access for examination and copying of such public records which are in existence at the time of the request, as provided in this section. Fox v. Perroni, 358 Ark. 251, 188 S.W.3d 881 (2004).

Circuit judge's law clerk's personal check was a public record under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act (FOIA), §25-19-101 et seq., and the circuit judge was its custodian under §25-19-103(1) and had to disclose the check to an attorney and his counsel pursuant to this section where the circuit judge instructed his clerk to obtain copies of certain documents from a federal court for use in contempt proceedings against the attorney, and where the attorney and his counsel sought disclosure of the check under FOIA. Fox v. Perroni, 358 Ark. 251, 188 S.W.3d 881 (2004).

Seed sample did not meet the definition of a “public record” under §25-19-103 because it could not be said to be an object on which records and information may be stored or represented; the list of items that could be mediums did not contain a seed or any other object, and removal and destructive testing of seed samples went far beyond the inspection and copying of public records. Nolan v. Little, 359 Ark. 161, 196 S.W.3d 1 (2004).

Because not all of the emails that were requested by a newspaper were “public records” pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, but there was not enough evidence to discern which of them were “public records”, an in camera review was needed to make that determination. The definition of “public records” under the Freedom of Information Act, §25-19-101 et seq., was content-driven, and the only way to determine the content was to examine the emails because an analysis of messages based solely on the context in which they were created, without an examination of the content of the messages, was insufficient to determine whether the messages were “public records”.Pulaski County v. Ark. Democrat-Gazette, Inc., 370 Ark. 435, 260 S.W.3d 718 (2007).

Trial court erred by finding that appellees'requirement that the driver pay a deposit of $2, 475 to obtain the requested records did not violate the Freedom of Information Act because §25-19-109 did not apply, as the driver stated that she requested only copies of the recordings and did not ask for any type of special conversion or any type of compilation. The applicable provision to the driver's request was subsection (d) of this section, as she simply requested a copy of the files, and therefore appellees could not charge fees that exceeded the cost of reproduction and could not include the hourly rate of a captain in assessing costs to the driver.Daugherty v. Jacksonville Police Dep't, 2012 Ark. 264, 411 S.W.3d 196 (2012).

When a teacher made a Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) request to a school district (district) after the teacher was terminated, and the denial of that request was reviewed in the same case in which the termination was contested, a trial court had no jurisdiction to grant the district's renewed motion for a protective order because (1) the order was sought under Ark. R. Civ. P. 26(c), which was independent of the FOIA, and (2) the renewed motion initiated no FOIA case, as the district was the records custodian and only a citizen could seek review of the denial of an FOIA request, and the motion was litigated while the termination case was on appeal.Hollis v. Fayetteville Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2016 Ark. App. 132, 485 S.W.3d 280 (2016).

There is no attorney-client privilege or attorney work product exemption under this chapter. City of Fayetteville v. Edmark, 304 Ark. 179, 801 S.W.2d 275 (1990).

Litigation files prepared by an attorney hired by private medical malpractice liability insurance carriers to represent three doctors who worked for the state university were not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, §§25-19-101 to25-19-110, because the documents were not public records for purposes of subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section. As the doctors were sued in their personal capacity, simply changing the records request to name the doctors in their official capacity did not convert the documents from private to public; the documents were also attorney work-product and subject to the attorney-client privilege.Harrill & Sutter, PLLC v. Farrar, 2012 Ark. 180, 402 S.W.3d 511 (2012).

The term “Attorney General” as used in this section refers to the office as opposed to an individual, including not only the individual holding the elective office but also his authorized deputies and representatives. Bryant v. Mars, 309 Ark. 480, 830 S.W.2d 869 (1992).

The working papers of an outside consultant retained by the Attorney General, are also exempt from the Freedom of Information Act as working papers of the Attorney General. Bryant v. Mars, 309 Ark. 480, 830 S.W.2d 869 (1992).

Categorizing members of the public who may wish to learn of, and/or disagree with, actions of public officials, even to the point of litigation, does not make such a person or entity a “competitor” as envisioned by this chapter. City of Fayetteville v. Edmark, 304 Ark. 179, 801 S.W.2d 275 (1990).

A state agency can claim the competitive advantage exception on behalf of the person who supplied the information. Arkansas Dep't of Fin. v. Pharmacy Assocs., Inc., 333 Ark. 451, 970 S.W.2d 217 (1998).

The Department of Finance and Administration (DF&A) was not required to fully disclose a company's successful bid proposal to the DF&A since the bid proposal fell under the competitive advantage exception and since disclosure would not only be detrimental to the successful bidder, but also to the DF&A in the quality of information it would receive to requests for proposals in the future. Arkansas Dep't of Fin. v. Pharmacy Assocs., Inc., 333 Ark. 451, 970 S.W.2d 217 (1998).

Circuit court abused its discretion in issuing a permanent injunction in favor of plaintiff competitor under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., because the plaintiff failed to sue an entity covered under FOIA; the competitor could not sue a private corporation alone under FOIA and direct it to produce public records it possessed by virtue of its contracts with counties because the private corporation was not the custodian of the public records. The circuit court's conclusion that county officials were unnecessary parties to a dispute over access to their public records was clearly erroneous.Apprentice Info. Sys. v. DataScout, LLC, 2018 Ark. 146, 544 S.W.3d 39 (2018).

Unredacted access to certain accident reports should have been granted to an attorney seeking clients for his law practice because the Driver's Privacy Protection Act, 18 U.S.C. §§ 2721–2725, did not prohibit information contained in such reports from being released under the Freedom of Information Act. A vehicle accident report is not included in the definition of a “motor vehicle record,” regardless of whether, as a matter of convenience, some of the information included in an accident report may be taken from or verified by a database maintained by the Office of Motor Vehicles. Moreover, “personal information” does not include information on vehicular accidents.Ark. State Police v. Wren, 2016 Ark. 188, 491 S.W.3d 124 (2016), cert. denied, — U.S. —, 137 S. Ct. 623, 196 L. Ed. 2d 515 (2017).

Public access must be afforded only to those records statutorily required to be kept by public agencies and lists of recipients of complimentary football tickets kept by state university, since not required by statute, need not be opened to public. McMahan v. Board of Trustees, 255 Ark. 108, 499 S.W.2d 56 (1973).

An order sealing a written pretrial motion was exempted from inspection or copying under this section. Arkansas Newspaper, Inc. v. Patterson, 281 Ark. 213, 662 S.W.2d 826 (1984).

This section does not exempt working papers of employees of a legislative committee, only those of the legislator; therefore, the working papers of an auditor who was a state employee were not exempt. Legislative Joint Auditing Comm. v. Woosley, 291 Ark. 89, 722 S.W.2d 581 (1987).

The law enforcement exception to the Freedom of Information Act includes only agencies which investigate suspected criminal activity under the State Penal Code and have enforcement powers; therefore, the law enforcement exemption does not apply to state auditors working for the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee. Legislative Joint Auditing Comm. v. Woosley, 291 Ark. 89, 722 S.W.2d 581 (1987).

Records not of an “undisclosed investigation” are public and available for examination. City of Fayetteville v. Rose, 294 Ark. 468, 743 S.W.2d 817 (1988)Criticized byArkansas Gazette Co. v. Goodwin, 304 Ark. 204, 801 S.W.2d 284 (Ark. 1990).

Real estate appraisals did not amount to working papers, correspondence, and unpublished memoranda of the Attorney General. Ark. Hwy. & Transp. Dep't v. Hope Brick Works, Inc., 294 Ark. 490, 744 S.W.2d 711 (1988).

Disclosures requested held not protected by exception in subdivision (b)(8) of this section. Ark. Hwy. & Transp. Dep't v. Hope Brick Works, Inc., 294 Ark. 490, 744 S.W.2d 711 (1988).

Exclusion in subdivision (b)(9) is intended to prevent competitors from obtaining information about others seeking the same type of work or furnishing material to the state. Ark. Hwy. & Transp. Dep't v. Hope Brick Works, Inc., 294 Ark. 490, 744 S.W.2d 711 (1988).

Attorney-client privilege is not one of exceptions of this section. Ark. Hwy. & Transp. Dep't v. Hope Brick Works, Inc., 294 Ark. 490, 744 S.W.2d 711 (1988).

When a criminal case is closed by administrative action, the reason for the exemption under subdivision (b)(6) no longer exists, and statements previously exempted thereby may be released. McCambridge v. City of Little Rock, 298 Ark. 219, 766 S.W.2d 909 (1989).

Applying the general rule of prospectivity which governs interpretation of statutes, the application of the May 14, 1990, version of Rule 7 of the Rules of Judicial Discipline & Disability Commission is prospective, and thus the Judicial Discipline & Disability Commission is not required to divulge its actions prior to that time which were protected under the former rule and statute. Gannett River States Pub. Co. v. Arkansas Judicial Discipline & Disability Com., 304 Ark. 244, 801 S.W.2d 292 (1990).

Because only the General Assembly can create exceptions to this chapter, a statute must specifically provide for nondisclosure before a court will exempt a public record from the chapter. Troutt Bros. v. Emison, 311 Ark. 27, 841 S.W.2d 604 (1992).

There must be a specific statutory mandate to exempt public records from disclosure. Byrne v. Eagle, 319 Ark. 587, 892 S.W.2d 487 (1995).

The home addresses of 2 police officers, which were sought by the plaintiff in a civil action so as to decrease his cost of service of process, were exempt from disclosure as an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy. Stilley v. McBride, 332 Ark. 306, 965 S.W.2d 125 (1998).
